Maryland, session 2026, HB0167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
SUBTITLE 6. GASOLINE–POWERED LEAF BLOWERS.
3–601.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “GASOLINE–POWERED LEAF BLOWER”:
(1) MEANS A COMBUSTION ENGINE–POWERED HANDHELD,
BACKPACK, OR WALK–BEHIND LEAF OR GRASS BLOWER, VACUUM, OR LEAF DEBRIS
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0167*

HOUSE BILL 167
REMOVAL DEVICE;
(2) INCLUDES AN ELECTRIC LEAF BLOWER CONNECTED TO A
GENERATOR POWERED BY GASOLINE OR OTHER FOSSIL FUELS; AND
(3) DOES NOT INCLUDE A STATIONARY OR TOW–BEHIND LEAF
VACUUM, MULCHER, DEBRIS LOADER DEVICE, OR SNOW BLOWER.
3–602.
THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(1) WILDLAND FIRE SUPPRESSION ACTIVITIES;
(2) PRESCRIBED BURN MANAGEMENT ACTIVITIES;
(3) FIRE FIGHTING ACTIVITIES CARRIED OUT BY AUTHORIZED
PERSONNEL; OR
(4) EMERGENCY RESPONSE ACTIVITIES, INCLUDING ACTIVITIES TO
CLEAR SURFACES FOLLOWING A CRASH, CARRIED OUT BY AUTHORIZED PERSONNEL
AT A TRANSPORTATION FACILITY AS DEFINED IN § 3–101 OF THE TRANSPORTATION
ARTICLE.
3–603.
(A) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, THE STATE MAY NOT PURCHASE A
GASOLINE–POWERED LEAF BLOWER.
(B) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2031, THE STATE, OR ANY CONTRACTOR OR
SUBCONTRACTOR EMPLOYED BY THE STATE WORKING ON STATE–OWNED LAND,
MAY NOT USE A GASOLINE–POWERED LEAF BLOWER.
3–604.
EACH AGENCY IN THE EXECUTIVE BRANCH OF STATE GOVERNMENT SHALL
MONITOR AND ENFORCE THAT AGENCY’S COMPLIANCE WITH THE PROVISIONS OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
3–605.
(A) THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT AFFECT THE AUTHORITY OF A COUNTY, A
MUNICIPALITY, OR ANY OTHER LOCAL GOVERNMENT TO ENACT STANDARDS THAT

HOUSE BILL 167 3
ARE AT LEAST AS STRINGENT AS THE STANDARDS ESTABLISHED IN THIS SUBTITLE
OR THAT BEGIN ON AN EARLIER DATE THAN THE DATES ESTABLISHED IN THIS
SUBTITLE.
(B) THE STATE, OR ANY CONTRACTOR OR SUBCONTRACTOR EMPLOYED BY
THE STATE, SHALL COMPLY WITH LOCAL GOVERNMENT STANDARDS THAT ARE AT
LEAST AS STRINGENT AS THE STANDARDS ESTABLISHED IN THIS SUBTITLE WHEN
MANAGING STATE PROPERTY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.